Utah statutes.
16-6a-1007.   Amendment of articles of incorporation pursuant to reorganization.

(1)  Articles of incorporation may be amended, without action by the board of directors or members, to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under a statute of this state or of the United States if the articles of incorporation after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by Section 16-6a-202.

(2)  For an amendment to the articles of incorporation to be made pursuant to Subsection (1), one or more individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the division for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

(a)  the name of the nonprofit corporation;

(b)  the text of each amendment approved by the court;

(c)  the date of the court's order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

(d)  the title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

(e)  a statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under a specified statute of this state or of the United States.

(3)  This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

